Nebraska, session 109, LB866.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB866 LB866
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 71-2490, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-2490 (1) The Nebraska Opioid Recovery Trust Fund is created. The
fund shall include all recoveries received on behalf of the state by the
Department of Justice pursuant to the Consumer Protection Act or the
Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act related to the advertising of
opioids. The fund shall include any money, payments, or other things of
value in the nature of civil damages or other payment, except criminal
penalties, whether such recovery is by way of verdict, judgment,
compromise, or settlement in or out of court, of any case or controversy
pursuant to such acts. The Department of Justice shall remit any such
revenue to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Opioid Recovery
Trust Fund.
(2) Any funds appropriated, expended, or distributed from the
Nebraska Opioid Recovery Trust Fund shall be spent in accordance with the
terms of any verdict, judgment, compromise, or settlement in or out of
court, of any case or controversy brought by the Attorney General
pursuant to the Consumer Protection Act or the Uniform Deceptive Trade
Practices Act.
(3) The Nebraska Opioid Recovery Trust Fund shall exclude funds held
in a trust capacity where specific benefits accrue to specific
individuals, organizations, political subdivisions, or governments. Such
excluded funds shall be deposited in the State Settlement Trust Fund
pursuant to section 59-1608.05.
(4)(a) Any money transferred from the Nebraska Opioid Recovery Trust
Fund shall be expended in accordance with the terms and conditions of the
litigation or settlement from which the money was received.
(b) The State Treasurer shall transfer the following amounts from
the Nebraska Opioid Recovery Trust Fund on or after July 1, 2024, but
before July 15, 2024, and on or after July 1 but before July 15 of each
year thereafter:
-2-

LB866 LB866
2026 2026
(i) One million one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars to the
Training Division Cash Fund to connect first responders to behavioral
health services, supports, and training and for a statewide wellness
learning plan that includes anonymous assessments, education, and
awareness to promote resiliency development;
(ii) Four hundred thousand dollars to the Health and Human Services
Cash Fund for staff to carry out the Overdose Fatality Review Teams Act;
(iii) Three million dollars to the Opioid Prevention and Treatment
Cash Fund for purposes of the Opioid Prevention and Treatment Act; and
(iv) An amount determined by the Legislature to the Opioid Treatment
Infrastructure Cash Fund; and .
(v) An amount determined by the Legislature to the Drug Detection
and Prevention Cash Fund for purposes of section 2 of this act.
(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that, of the total
settlement funds received by the State of Nebraska and transferred from
the Nebraska Opioid Recovery Trust Fund to the Opioid Prevention and
Treatment Cash Fund and to the Opioid Treatment Infrastructure Cash Fund,
twenty-five percent of such funds are transferred to the Opioid
Prevention and Treatment Cash Fund and seventy-five percent of such funds
are transferred to the Opioid Treatment Infrastructure Cash Fund.
(5) Any money in the Nebraska Opioid Recovery Trust Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 2. (1) The Drug Detection and Prevention Cash Fund is created.
The fund shall be administered by the Attorney General and shall consist
of any amount transferred to the fund by the Legislature. It is the
intent of the Legislature not to transfer any General Funds to the Drug
Detection and Prevention Cash Fund. No portion of the principal of the
fund shall be expended for any purpose except investment pursuant to this
section.
-3-

LB866 LB866
2026 2026
(2) The Drug Detection and Prevention Cash Fund shall be used to
support statewide law enforcement efforts to detect, prevent, and respond
to illegal fentanyl activity and other illicit drug activity, including,
but not limited to:
(a) Acquisition of drug detection, testing, and analytical
technology;
(b) Support for multijurisdictional task forces and cross-agency
operations directed at tracking and distribution of fentanyl and other
illicit drugs;
(c) Public safety and community education initiatives related to
risk awareness and overdose prevention strategies regarding fentanyl and
other illicit drugs coordinated with law enforcement activity; and
(d) Any other purpose the Attorney General determines is necessary
to reduce the surplus of illegal fentanyl or other illicit drugs in
Nebraska or to support related law enforcement efforts.
(3) Any money in the Drug Detection and Prevention Cash Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 3. Original section 71-2490, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-4-